Tennessee, session 114, SB1601.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 66, Chapter 28, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) As used in this section, "real estate investment trust (REIT)" means an entity
that has an election in effect under § 856(c)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code (26 U.S.C.
§ 856(c)(1)).
(b)
(1) Upon the adoption of a resolution by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the
governing body of the municipality, a municipality may require a real estate
investment trust that owns, operates, or finances ten (10) or more dwelling units
within the municipality's corporate boundaries to furnish the following information
with the agency or department of local government that is responsible for
enforcing building codes in the municipality:
(A) The REIT's or the REIT's agent's name, telephone number,
and physical address, which does not include a post office box; and
(B) The street address and unit number, as appropriate, for each
dwelling unit that the REIT owns, leases, or subleases or has the right to
own, lease, or sublease.
(2) The information required under subdivision (b)(1) must be furnished
on a form provided by the agency or department responsible for enforcing
SB1601
010723
- 1 -

building codes. The agency or department shall not collect from a REIT filing the
form any fee.
(3) If any information required under subdivision (b)(1) or the ownership
of the dwelling units change, then the REIT that transferred the property by sale
or otherwise, or the REIT's agent, shall notify the agency or department of the
change within thirty (30) days of the change.
(c)
(1) The agency or department of local government that is responsible for
enforcing building codes in the municipality where the dwelling units are located
shall assess a fine of fifty dollars ($50.00) per week against a REIT that fails to
register or that fails to send notification of a change of information or ownership
as required by subsection (b).
(2) Prior to the assessment of the fine, the REIT must be given an
opportunity to appear and be heard at a hearing to be held concerning the REIT's
failure to register or failure to send notification of a change of information or
ownership. A written notice of the date, time, and place of the hearing must be
mailed to the REIT or REIT's agent at least fifteen (15) days prior to the date of
the scheduled hearing.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 010723